Food Allergy CODIT Oral Immunotherapy | Aimmune | Home     
  Welcome to Aimmune Therapeutics, formerly Allergen Research Corporation (ARC).We're pleased to announce our new name and launch our new website. Thank you for visiting! Visit Site  Friendshipsdon't have a listof ingredients.Aimmune is developing desensitization treatments to protect people with food allergies by potentially making accidental exposures less dangerous. Learn More  CODIT™ & Oral ImmunotherapyAimmune is developing treatments for food allergies using biologic product candidates and our characterized oral desensitization immunotherapy (CODIT™) approach. We built CODIT on a foundation of extensive independent scientific research on oral immunotherapy that shows that patients with food allergies may become desensitized by ingesting their allergens in gradually increasing amounts and then maintaining a steady daily dose thereafter. We aim to offer characterized biologic products to help protect people with food allergies against life-threatening reactions from accidental exposures. Learn More  AR101 for Peanut AllergyWe are conducting Phase 3 studies of our lead product candidate, AR101, for the treatment of peanut allergy, one of the most common food allergies, in peanut-allergic patients ages 4-55 years in the United States, Canada and Europe. We are also working to develop treatments for other common food allergies using characterized biologic product candidates and our CODIT™ approach. Learn MoreRecent NewsJuly 5, 2017Aimmune Therapeutics Enrolls First Patient in ARTEMIS (ARC010) European Phase 3 Clinical Trial of AR101 for the Treatment of Peanut AllergyJune 20, 2017Aimmune Therapeutics Presents European Phase 3 PALISADE Screening Data at 2017 European Academy of Allergy and Clinical Immunology (EAACI) CongressJune 15, 2017Aimmune Therapeutics to Present Data on Peanut Allergy in Europe at the European Academy of Allergy and Clinical Immunology (EAACI) Congress 2017 See More  Leadership | Aimmune | Food Allergy Oral Immunotherapy   
  Welcome to Aimmune Therapeutics, formerly Allergen Research Corporation (ARC).We're pleased to announce our new name and launch our new website. Thank you for visiting! Visit Site Addressing food allergies—leading an emerging therapeutic space by responding to a growing and critical unmet medical needThe experienced biotech and pharmaceutical leaders of Aimmune’s executive and management teams are inspired by the patients, families and physicians managing the daily risks associated with food allergies.Executive Team   Daniel C. Adelman Chief Medical Officer  Daniel C. Adelman, MD, is Aimmunes’s Chief Medical Officer. As an allergist and immunologist, he has led drug development at biotechnology companies for more than 20 years and taught and practiced medicine at the University of California, San Francisco, for more than 25 years. Most recently, Dr. Adelman spent seven years as Chief Medical Officer and Senior Vice President of Development at Alvine Pharmaceuticals, a biopharmaceutical company focused on autoimmune and inflammatory diseases, particularly celiac disease. He held the same positions, as Chief Medical Officer and Senior Vice President of Development, during five years at Sunesis Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Earlier, Dr. Adelman served in various roles at Pharmacyclics, Inc., including Vice President of Clinical Operations and Biometrics, and was a Clinical Scientist at Genentech, Inc.Dr. Adelman has published extensively in allergy, clinical immunology and autoimmunity, and oncology. He served on the Research Advisory Board of Food Allergy Research & Education (FARE) for more than five years and on the editorial board of the Journal of Allergy and Clinical Immunology for five years. He now serves on several clinical scientific advisory boards and on the editorial boards of Clinical Immunology and Journal of Clinical Immunology. Dr. Adelman holds a bachelor’s degree in biology from the University of California, Berkeley, and earned his MD from the University of California, Davis.   Sue Barrowcliffe General Manager of Europe  Sue Barrowcliffe is Aimmune’s General Manager of Europe and was formerly the company’s Senior Vice President, Regulatory, as well. She has 25 years of experience in global regulatory affairs and drug development with both large and small companies and has been CEO of a university spun-out oncology research company in the United Kingdom. Most recently, Ms. Barrowcliffe led her own consultancy, Right Track Regulatory, serving biotech companies for more than eight years.Previously, she was Director of Regulatory and Medical Strategy for Idis and VP of Regulatory Affairs Europe for Chiron BioPharmaceuticals. She was also VP Development for British Biotech, VP of Worldwide Product Registration for SmithKline Beecham, and Director of European Regulatory Affairs for Marion Merrell Dow. Ms. Barrowcliffe has a first class honours degree in Biochemistry from the University of Sheffield, UK.   Eric Bjerkholt Chief Financial Officer  Eric Bjerkholt is Aimmune’s Chief Financial Officer. He has more than three decades of healthcare and biotechnology leadership experience in finance and related functions, both as an executive at publicly traded and early-stage companies and as an investment banker. Prior to joining Aimmune, he was CFO at Sunesis Pharmaceuticals, Inc., where, over 13 years with the company, his role expanded to oversee business development and multiple aspects of governance and corporate relations. In addition to taking Sunesis through its initial public offering in 2005, he raised more than $400 million for the company in other financings.Prior to Sunesis, Mr. Bjerkholt was CFO at IntraBiotics Pharmaceuticals, Inc., and LifeSpring Nutrition, Inc. He began his healthcare career at J.P. Morgan & Co. as an investment banker in New York and then launched the company’s Western U.S. healthcare practice. Mr. Bjerkholt holds a Cand. Oecon. (master’s) degree in economics from the University of Oslo and an M.B.A. from Harvard Business School. He has served on the boards of directors of several publicly traded companies and is currently a member of the board of directors and chair of the audit committee for Corium International, Inc.   Ken Boehm SVP, Human Resources  Ken Boehm is Aimmune’s Senior Vice President of Human Resources. He has more than thirty years of experience in human resources across several industries, including biotech, high-tech, and software, and has led human resources or filled a significant HR role in both very large companies and early stage, start-up companies. Most recently, Mr. Boehm was Senior Vice President, Human Resources, at E2open, a software cloud platform company.He was also led human resources for CV Therapeutics, where he was instrumental in their fast growth to nearly one thousand employees as the company prepared for commercial launch. Earlier, he provided human resources leadership at such companies as Gilead, Polycom, and Synopsys. Mr. Boehm holds a BA in Mathematics from the University of California, Los Angeles and an MBA from Pepperdine University.   Stephen G. Dilly Chief Executive Officer  Stephen G. Dilly, MBBS, PhD, is Aimmune’s Chief Executive Officer and a member of Aimmune’s Board of Directors. His previous positions include Chief Executive Officer at APT Pharmaceuticals; Senior Vice President, Head of Development, and Chief Medical Officer at Chiron BioPharmaceuticals; and a number of senior executive clinical, development and commercial support positions at Genentech and SmithKline Beecham.Dr. Dilly played important roles in the development and approval of numerous drugs, including Kytril®, Requip®, Kredex®, Paxil CR®, Cathflo Activase®, Raptiva®, Xolair®, Avastin®, Lucentis®, Cubicin® and Tarceva®. He is on the Board of Sangamo Biosciences. Dr. Dilly received a PhD in Cardiac Physiology from the University of London and holds an MBBS, graduating as a physician from the University of London.   Jeffrey H. Knapp Chief Operating Officer  Jeffrey H. Knapp is Aimmune’s Chief Operating Officer. He brings more than 25 years of experience in the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industry, most recently as Chief Operating Officer at Adamas Pharmaceuticals, which he joined as Chief Commercial Officer in early 2014. Mr. Knapp was previously Chief Commercial Officer at Affymax Inc., where, over seven years in the role, he built out the company’s U.S. commercial organization and led the launch of its first product.He has also led sales and marketing at Abgenix, Pharmion, and EMD Pharmaceuticals. He spent the first half of his career at Eli Lilly & Company and Schering-Plough in various sales, marketing and business development roles. Mr. Knapp earned his bachelor’s degree in biology from Wittenberg University.   Mary Rozenman SVP, Corporate Development and Strategy  Mary Rozenman, PhD, is Aimmune’s Senior Vice President of Corporate Development and Strategy. Prior to joining Aimmune in 2015, Dr. Rozenman was a Vice President at Longitude Capital, where she focused on mid-stage biotechnology investments and was an observer on Aimmune’s Board of Directors. Dr. Rozenman was previously a Junior Partner at McKinsey & Company and a leader in the Healthcare and Corporate Finance practices.At McKinsey, she advised senior management of leading pharmaceutical companies on a range of strategic and operational issues across marketing, sales, and clinical and corporate development. She also led McKinsey’s global Biosimilars practice. Dr. Rozenman holds a PhD in Organic Chemistry and Chemical Biology from Harvard University and a BA in Russian Literature and Biochemistry from Columbia University. Her scientific work has been published in premier scientific journals, including Nature, and she is a named inventor on several patents.   Douglas Sheehy General Counsel and Secretary  Douglas Sheehy is Aimmune’s General Counsel and Secretary. He has more than 20 years of both in-house and law firm experience, including nearly a decade as general counsel. Mr. Sheehy joined Aimmune from Codexis, Inc., a developer of biocatalysts for the pharmaceutical and fine chemical industries, where he was hired as General Counsel and Secretary in 2007. Most recently, he was also the company’s Chief Administrative Officer.Previously, Mr. Sheehy spent five years in key legal roles at CV Therapeutics, Inc., a publicly held biopharmaceutical company that was subsequently acquired by Gilead in 2009. He began his legal career as a corporate attorney at Gunderson Dettmer LLP. Mr. Sheehy holds a BA in history from Dartmouth College and a JD from American University, where he served as Editor-in-Chief of the Law Review.   William Turner SVP, Global Regulatory Affairs and Quality Assurance  Bill Turner is Aimmune’s Senior Vice President, Global Regulatory Affairs and Quality Assurance. He has more than 25 years of experience in regulatory affairs and quality assurance with biotechnology companies in all stages of clinical development, including extensive experience in biologics. Most recently, he led his own consultancy, where he advised executives and led regulatory and quality activities across multiple therapeutic areas.Previously, Mr. Turner spent seven years at Dynavax Technologies, where he was Vice President, Regulatory Affairs and Corporate Quality Systems, and six years at MedImmune where he was Senior Director of Regulatory Affairs. Earlier in his career, he handled regulatory affairs at Allergan and Alpha Therapeutics Corporation (now Grifols Biologicals). Mr. Turner holds a BS degree in Medical Microbiology from California State University, Long Beach.  Pipeline | Aimmune | Food Allergies CODIT Oral Immunotherapy   
  Welcome to Aimmune Therapeutics, formerly Allergen Research Corporation (ARC).We're pleased to announce our new name and launch our new website. Thank you for visiting! Visit Site Developing treatments to help protect people with food allergiesOur portfolio of development programs targets the most prevalent food allergies, starting with peanut, using our characterized oral desensitization immunotherapy (CODIT™) approach.We are currently conducting PALISADE, our Phase 3 pivotal trial for AR101 for the treatment of peanut allergy.  We plan to follow our AR101 program with additional programs for other food allergies. ProgramPRE-INDPHASE 1/2*PHASE 3APPROVED phase AR101 (PEANUT)PRE-INDPHASE 1/2*PHASE 3APPROVED  PH 3Peanut allergy is one of the most common food allergies and appears to be on the rise in children. Reactions from even a trace amount of the allergen can be severe and include potentially fatal anaphylaxis. Peanut allergies tend to be life long, with only approximately 20 percent of peanut-allergic children eventually outgrowing the allergy. PROGRAM 2 (EGG)PRE-INDPHASE 1/2*PHASE 3APPROVED  PRE-INDWe are planning to initiate a second development program, targeting egg allergy. PROGRAM 3PRE-INDPHASE 1/2*PHASE 3APPROVED  PRE-INDWe are evaluating other opportunities to initiate a third development program.*Because (1) our treatment product candidates are based on foods that have not shown toxicology issues except in their functions as allergens, we have not been required to and at this time do not anticipate conducting Phase 1 clinical trials.  Careers | Aimmune | Food Allergy CODIT Oral Immunotherapy   
  Welcome to Aimmune Therapeutics, formerly Allergen Research Corporation (ARC).We're pleased to announce our new name and launch our new website. Thank you for visiting! Visit Site Building a team to address the unmet medical need associated with food allergiesSince our founding in 2011, we have built a team of disciplined and experienced biotech and pharmaceutical professionals who relish the challenges of drug development and commercialization and strive to bring critical healthcare solutions to patients  Everyone at Aimmune is dedicated to addressing the urgent unmet need for treatments for food allergies, through our individual functions — be they scientific, medical, development, commercial, technical or operational — and our collaborative efforts. We take inspiration from the patients, families and physicians managing the life-threatening risks associated with food allergies. Every day, we work hard toward the goal of offering them a margin of safety that can help alleviate the fear and stress of accidental exposure to food allergens.If you are interested in helping define an emerging therapeutic space and working to make a profound difference in the lives of people with food allergies, please contact careers@aimmune.com and follow our postings of current career opportunities. Current listings — United StatesAccounting & External Reporting — AP / Payroll SpecialistClinical Trial — AssistantCRA — SeniorHuman Resources – Associate DirectorManufacturing and Process Development – Florida Site ManagerManufacturing and Supply Chain – Manager, Production Planning & Materials ManagementMedical and Scientific Communications – DirectorProject Management — Senior Manager Statistical Programming — Director Current listings — London, UKClinical Development — Vice PresidentEU Regulatory Affairs — Senior ManagerAimmune is committed to providing a positive work environment that supports rigorous execution, innovative solutions and equal opportunity.  Contact | Aimmune | Food Allergy CODIT Oral Immunotherapy   
  Welcome to Aimmune Therapeutics, formerly Allergen Research Corporation (ARC).We're pleased to announce our new name and launch our new website. Thank you for visiting! Visit Site Contacting AimmuneAimmune is a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company with headquarters in the San Francisco Bay Area’s biotechnology center. We are working to lead an emerging therapeutic space and make a profound difference in the lives of people with food allergies by developing and commercializing desensitization treatments for peanut and other food allergies.* Denotes required fieldInquiry for:*-- select --General InformationClinical TrialsCorporate DevelopmentMedical AffairsMedia / PRInvestor RelationsName*   First    Last Name Email* PhoneComments Submit        Corporate Headquarters8000 Marina Boulevard Suite 200 Brisbane, CA 94005-1884 Phone: (650) 614-5220Fax: (650) 616-0075Aimmune Europe344-354 Gray’s Inn Road London WC1X 8BP Phone: +44 208 629 0240  About Us | Aimmune | Food Allergy CODIT Oral Immunotherapy   
  Welcome to Aimmune Therapeutics, formerly Allergen Research Corporation (ARC).We're pleased to announce our new name and launch our new website. Thank you for visiting! Visit Site Developing desensitization treatments to help protect people with food allergies from the potentially life-threatening consequences of accidental exposureAimmune is a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company developing proprietary product candidates and advancing a therapeutic approach for the treatment of peanut and other food allergies.  Our MissionOur mission is to improve the lives of people with food allergies by developing and commercializing proprietary desensitization therapies that safely and reliably protect them against reactions from accidental exposures to food allergens.We aim to address food allergies by providing a treatment option that goes beyond the current recommendations of avoiding exposure to food allergens and carrying epinephrine for administration in case of accidental exposure.With our AR101 program, which builds from our Phase 2 studies and is now in Phase 3 testing, we are conducting the world’s largest rigorous examination of oral treatment for peanut allergy.Building on OITOur CODIT™ approach is based on extensive independent scientific research demonstrating that patients with food allergies may become desensitized to the allergens, or proteins, in a particular food through the oral administration of gradually increasing amounts of the allergens.In oral immunotherapy (OIT), a very small amount of an allergen is administered on a daily basis and then regularly increased until desensitization to a certain amount of the allergen has been achieved.While studies by leading researchers have shown the effectiveness of OIT with peanuts, milk and other primary food allergens, access to the therapy remains limited. Our CODIT™ ApproachWe plan to develop and commercialize characterized biologic product candidates for use with CODIT™ (characterized oral desensitization immunotherapy), our approach to OIT. CODIT is intended to achieve meaningful levels of protection by desensitizing patients with defined, precise amounts of key allergens.Our first application of CODIT is with AR101, an investigational biologic oral immunotherapy for peanut allergy.  History | Aimmune | Food Allergy CODIT Oral Immunotherapy   
  Welcome to Aimmune Therapeutics, formerly Allergen Research Corporation (ARC).We're pleased to announce our new name and launch our new website. Thank you for visiting! Visit Site Responding to food allergy leaders’ request to address a growing unmet medical needAimmune Therapeutics was created in response to a united call to action from an assembly of the leading minds and key stakeholders in food allergy. In April 2011, the Food Allergy Initiative (FAI), then the largest private funder of food allergy research, brought together 40 of the most noted experts and contributors to the field of food allergy for a research retreat at Harvard Medical School. The objective of the retreat was to reach consensus on the direction of food allergy research.At this landmark event, prominent academic researchers, senior government officials, and industry and advocacy leaders agreed that safe, effective, FDA-approved treatments to address the growing problem of food allergies were within reach. Among the outcomes of the meeting, the group concluded that there needed to be a large, Phase 3 registration trial of oral immunotherapy (OIT) — which had been explored since the beginning of the 20th century — to establish a validated, optimized OIT product and protocol.But such an effort was beyond the scope and resources of academic researchers or nonprofits — it needed to happen in the professional realm of the biotechnology or pharmaceutical industry. Dr. Bryan Walser, who had facilitated the retreat as a consultant for FAI, sought a corporate partner for the development work to support a trial, but none emerged.Ultimately, Dr. Walser drew from his biotech experience to put together Allergen Research Corporation (or ARC, now Aimmune) in 2011, dedicated to OIT drug development. Researchers from Duke University, the University of Arkansas, and Stanford University also played key roles in getting the company started by licensing their data from important OIT studies.In 2012, FAI merged with the Food Allergy & Anaphylaxis Network (FAAN), the most trusted source of food allergy information, programs and resources, to form Food Allergy Research and Education (FARE), the nation’s leading nonprofit focused on food allergies.With a mission of ensuring the safety and inclusion of individuals with food allergies while relentlessly seeking a cure, FARE invested the seed money to found ARC and used its extensive network to generate a total investment of $12M from FARE and several high net-worth individuals connected to food allergies. This funding allowed ARC to advance studies of OIT sufficiently to attract our first institutional investor, Longitude Capital, to complete a $17M Series A financing and execute on a Phase 2 clinical trial of OIT for peanut allergy. In 2015, along with the successful completion of our Phase 2 study, we closed an $80 million Series B financing.Now, as Aimmune, we are conducting Phase 3 studies of our lead product candidate, AR101, a biologic oral immunotherapy for the treatment of peanut allergy, using characterized oral desensitization immunotherapy (CODIT™), our approach to OIT. We are also planning upcoming clinical trials with our CODIT approach for other common food allergies.We aim to fulfill the 2011 shared vision of establishing a characterized OIT product and validated approach, to be made available in allergists’ offices nationwide and beyond, so that people with food allergies can live with less fear and more safety.  

Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 25, 2017 10:16 PM ET
Biotechnology

Company Overview of Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc., a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company, develops and commercializes product candidates for the treatment of peanut and other food allergies in the United States and Europe. Its lead Characterized Oral Desensitization ImmunoTherapy product candidate is AR101, an investigational biologic for the treatment of patients with peanut allergy. Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. has strategic collaboration with an affiliate of Nestle Health Science US Holdings, Inc. for the advancement of food allergy therapeutics. The company was formerly known as Allergen Research Corporation and changed its name to Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. in May 2015. The company was founded in 2011 and ...
Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc., a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company, develops and commercializes product candidates for the treatment of peanut and other food allergies in the United States and Europe. Its lead Characterized Oral Desensitization ImmunoTherapy product candidate is AR101, an investigational biologic for the treatment of patients with peanut allergy. Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. has strategic collaboration with an affiliate of Nestle Health Science US Holdings, Inc. for the advancement of food allergy therapeutics. The company was formerly known as Allergen Research Corporation and changed its name to Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. in May 2015. The company was founded in 2011 and is headquartered in Brisbane, California.
Detailed Description


8000 Marina BoulevardSuite 300Brisbane, CA 94005United StatesFounded in 201181 Employees



Phone: 650-614-5220

Fax: 650-616-0075

www.aimmune.com







Key Executives for Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc.




Dr. Stephen George Dilly M.B.B.S, Ph.D.


      	Chief Executive Officer, President and Director
      


Age: 57
        

Total Annual Compensation: $440.0K








Mr. Jeffrey H. Knapp


      	Chief Operating Officer
      


Age: 51
        

Total Annual Compensation: $343.8K








Dr. Daniel C. Adelman M.D.


      	Chief Medical Officer
      


Age: 60
        

Total Annual Compensation: $216.7K








Dr. Mary M. Rozenman Ph.D.


      	Senior Vice President of Corporate Development and Strategy
      


Age: 36
        

Total Annual Compensation: $252.1K





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2016. 

Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. Key Developments

Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. Enrolls First Patient in ARTEMIS (ARC010) European Phase 3 Clinical Trial of AR101 for the Treatment of Peanut Allergy
Jul 5 17
Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. announced the enrollment of its first patient in the European Phase 3 ARTEMIS (ARC010) clinical trial of AR101 for treatment of peanut allergy. AR101 is Aimmune’s investigational biologic oral immunotherapy for desensitization of patients with peanut allergy. The randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled ARTEMIS (AR101 Trial in Europe Measuring oral Immunotherapy Success) clinical trial of AR101 will enroll approximately 160 peanut-allergic children and adolescents ages 4-17 at multiple sites in several European countries. The ARTEMIS trial follows Aimmune’s ongoing Phase 3 PALISADE trial, taking place in eight countries in Europe, the United States, and Canada. Aimmune designed the ARTEMIS trial to expand the data on the level of and speed to clinically meaningful modulation of the immune response to AR101 treatment. The primary efficacy endpoint for ARTEMIS is tolerating a 1,000-mg single dose of peanut protein (the equivalent of approximately three to four peanut kernels) in a progressive, exit double-blind, placebo-controlled food challenge (DBPCFC) after approximately nine months of treatment. The enrollment criteria for ARTEMIS allow inclusion of peanut-allergic patients who react to 300 mg or less of peanut protein in an entry DBPCFC.


Aimmune Therapeutics Presents European Phase 3 PALISADE Screening Data
Jun 20 17
Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. reported findings from pre-randomization, preliminary clinical data collected from the European screening population of the PALISADE trial in Aimmune’s AR101 program. In addition, the company reported observations from a survey on current management and use of oral immunotherapy for peanut allergy across Western Europe. The data were presented at the 2017 European Academy of Allergy and Clinical Immunology (EAACI) Congress in Helsinki. Aimmune presented a preliminary dataset of 166 patients in Europe who underwent a screening double-blind, placebo-controlled food challenge (DBPCFC) to determine eligibility for the PALISADE trial (57% ages 4–11, 28% ages 12–17, and 15% ages 18–55; 59% male). The DBPCFC allowed a progression of doses of peanut protein up to a dose of 100 mg (1 mg, 3 mg, 10 mg, 30 mg, and 100 mg). Patients who reacted with dose-limiting symptoms at or before the 100-mg dose (“reactors”) were eligible for randomization into the trial. Observations from preliminary evaluable baseline characteristics results from these patients included the following: 62% of the subjects screened were reactors, who experienced dose-limiting symptoms in the DBPCFC at or before the 100-mg dose (median = 30 mg dose, meaning a cumulative amount of 44 mg peanut protein); 38% were “non-reactors” who consumed all doses in the DBPCFC with no dose-limiting symptoms; Reactors had a statistically significant larger peanut skin-prick test (SPT) wheal diameters, a higher peanut-specific IgE (psIgE) and higher Ara h 2–specific IgE than non-reactors. Ara h 2–specific IgE demonstrated greatest sensitivity and specificity for discriminating between reactors and non-reactors, based on receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis of the data; SPT, peanut-specific IgE and Ara h 2 were not associated with the severity of reactions during the screening DBPCFC; Aimmune also presented the results from a survey of physicians across six Western European countries who offer oral immunotherapy to peanut-allergic patients. Interviews with 39 physicians revealed substantial variability in approaches for peanut oral immunotherapy within and across European countries, showing that there is currently no standardized approach or product for peanut oral immunotherapy in Europe.


Aimmune Therapeutics Reports on Up-Dosing in its Ongoing Phase 3 PALISADE Trial of AR101 for Peanut Allergy
Jun 12 17
Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. announced that, in the ongoing Phase 3 PALISADE trial of AR101, more than 97% of patients currently on study have completed up-dosing. AR101 is Aimmune’s proprietary, investigational biologic oral immunotherapy for desensitization of patients with peanut allergy. PALISADE is a double-blind, placebo-controlled trial designed to investigate the efficacy and safety of AR101 in peanut-allergic children, adolescents, and adults. A total of 554 peanut-allergic patients, ages 4-49, were randomized to receive either AR101 or placebo for approximately six months of up-dosing followed by six months of maintenance therapy. Aimmune remains blinded to data from the trial. Based on observations of aggregated data to date, Aimmune expects that the percentage of patients completing the entire study (up-dosing and maintenance) will be well ahead of the powering calculations behind the study design. With the vast majority of patients now successfully through up-dosing in PALISADE, Aimmune estimates that final study visits will be completed around year-end 2017, and that topline data will be available in the first quarter of 2018.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 20n Labs, Inc. United States 23andMe, Inc. United States 2C Tech Corporation, Inc. United States 3-V Biosciences, Inc. United States 3Bar Biologics Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Private Placement

			      November 3, 2016
			    
--





Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc., please visit www.aimmune.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close


























Pipeline | Aimmune | Food Allergies CODIT Oral Immunotherapy   
  Welcome to Aimmune Therapeutics, formerly Allergen Research Corporation (ARC).We're pleased to announce our new name and launch our new website. Thank you for visiting! Visit Site Developing treatments to help protect people with food allergiesOur portfolio of development programs targets the most prevalent food allergies, starting with peanut, using our characterized oral desensitization immunotherapy (CODIT™) approach.We are currently conducting PALISADE, our Phase 3 pivotal trial for AR101 for the treatment of peanut allergy.  We plan to follow our AR101 program with additional programs for other food allergies. ProgramPRE-INDPHASE 1/2*PHASE 3APPROVED phase AR101 (PEANUT)PRE-INDPHASE 1/2*PHASE 3APPROVED  PH 3Peanut allergy is one of the most common food allergies and appears to be on the rise in children. Reactions from even a trace amount of the allergen can be severe and include potentially fatal anaphylaxis. Peanut allergies tend to be life long, with only approximately 20 percent of peanut-allergic children eventually outgrowing the allergy. PROGRAM 2 (EGG)PRE-INDPHASE 1/2*PHASE 3APPROVED  PRE-INDWe are planning to initiate a second development program, targeting egg allergy. PROGRAM 3PRE-INDPHASE 1/2*PHASE 3APPROVED  PRE-INDWe are evaluating other opportunities to initiate a third development program.*Because (1) our treatment product candidates are based on foods that have not shown toxicology issues except in their functions as allergens, we have not been required to and at this time do not anticipate conducting Phase 1 clinical trials.  




Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. - IPO Candy




































 Skip to primary navigation Skip to content 



BecomeaMember





 


IPO CandyEveryone's favorite site for IPO insights and analysis.Main navigationHome » Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc.Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc.
01/20/2016 by   Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc., a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company, engages in the development of desensitization treatments for peanut and other food allergies. Its characterized oral desensitization immunotherapy includes AR101, a product for the treatment of peanut allergy in children and adults that has completed a Phase II study. The company was formerly known as Allergen Research Corporation and changed its name to Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. in May 2015. The company was founded in 2011 and is headquartered in Brisbane, California.
 


Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc.


Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc., a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company, engages in the development of desensitization treatments for peanut and other food allergies. Its characterized oral desensitization immunotherapy includes AR101, a product for the treatment of peanut allergy in children and adults that has completed a Phase II study. The company was formerly known as Allergen Research Corporation and changed its name to Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. in May 2015. The company was founded in 2011 and is headquartered in Brisbane, California.

Twitter
Facebook
Google+
LinkedIn




Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc.<p>Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc., a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company, engages in the development of desensitization treatments for peanut and other food allergies. Its characterized oral desensitization immunotherapy includes AR101, a product for the treatment of peanut allergy in children and adults that has completed a Phase II study. The company was formerly known as Allergen Research Corporation and changed its name to Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. in May 2015. The company was founded in 2011 and is headquartered in Brisbane, California.</p>
CAUnited StatesPhone: 650-614-5220




AIMT


                Oral treatment for peanut and other allergies
            

Documents
Roadshow



Main CategoryHealthcare
CategoriesDrugs


Contact


        http://www.aimmune.com
    
650-614-5220
    








Address8000 Marina Boulevard, Suite 300, Brisbane, California, 94005, United States
            





 









We love IPOs
The IPO market provides a magical window into the most exciting technologies, emerging consumer trends and important business developments - all testing their mettle in the crucible of the public markets. We are constantly learning and researching to deliver the best insights available.










We are independent
We have no vested interests driving our work. All the investment banks and brokers on a deal are paid to do a sales and marketing job. Our job is to remain objective and use a fact-based approach to evaluate the potential for an IPO.










We get the best ratings
IPO Candy has been recognized since 2009 as the single best place to get commentary, analysis and assets in the IPO market. The most common write-in comment we get from users is that they "love what we do."










We share everything we know
With three decades of research under our belt we want to share what we have learned and the best practices we have discovered. Our IPO University contains texts, videos and resources to share our process and help everyone develop their skills.






Become an IPOCandy Member
Enjoy the benefits of full access to our content including access to IPO roadshow slideshows and transcripts included in our posts. Members also get additional insights via email, receive our monthly Candygram and have access to our IPO calendar.
Become a Member











AIMT Profile | Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. Stock - Yahoo FinanceHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreYahooSearchSearch0U.S. Markets closedS&P 5002,477.13+7.22 (+0.29%)Dow 3021,613.43+100.26 (+0.47%)Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. (AIMT)NasdaqGS - NasdaqGS Delayed Price. Currency in USDAdd to watchlist21.65-0.35 (-1.59%)At close:  4:00PM EDT21.65 0.00 (0.00%)After hours: 5:10PM EDTPeople also watchDBVTACRSGBTBPMCRGNXSummaryConversationsStatisticsProfileFinancialsOptionsHoldersHistorical DataAnalystsAimmune Therapeutics, Inc.8000 Marina BoulevardSuite 300Brisbane, CA 94005United States650-614-5220http://www.aimmune.comSector: HealthcareIndustry: BiotechnologyFull Time Employees: 81Key ExecutivesNameTitlePayExercisedAgeDr. Stephen George Dilly M.B.B.S, Ph.D.Chief Exec. Officer, Pres and Director660kN/A57Mr. Jeffrey H. KnappChief Operating Officer539.25kN/A51Dr. Daniel C. Adelman M.D.Chief Medical Officer293.07kN/A60Mr. Eric H. BjerkholtChief Financial OfficerN/AN/A57Dr. Laura  Hansen Ph.D.VP of Investor RelationsN/AN/AN/AAmounts are as of December 31, 2016 and compensation values are for the last fiscal year ending on that date. Pay is salary, bonuses, etc. Exercised is the value of options exercised during the fiscal year. Currency in USD.DescriptionAimmune Therapeutics, Inc., a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company, develops and commercializes product candidates for the treatment of peanut and other food allergies in the United States and Europe. Its lead Characterized Oral Desensitization ImmunoTherapy product candidate is AR101, an investigational biologic for the treatment of patients with peanut allergy. Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. has strategic collaboration with an affiliate of Nestle Health Science US Holdings, Inc. for the advancement of food allergy therapeutics. The company was formerly known as Allergen Research Corporation and changed its name to Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. in May 2015. The company was founded in 2011 and is headquartered in Brisbane, California.Corporate GovernanceAimmune Therapeutics, Inc.’s ISS Governance QualityScore as of July 1, 2017 is 9. The pillar scores are Audit: 2; Board: 8; Shareholder Rights: 8; Compensation: 7.Corporate governance scores courtesy of Institutional Shareholder Services (ISS).  Scores indicate decile rank relative to index or region. A decile score of 1 indicates lower governance risk, while a 10 indicates higher governance risk.Yahoo Small BusinessData DisclaimerHelpSuggestionsPrivacyAbout Our AdsTerms (Updated)














Aimmune Therapeutics Cuts Ribbon On Commercial Manufacturing Facility To Support Potential Launch Of Treatment For Peanut Allergy - TheStreet





























































 

 




















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 








































Aimmune Therapeutics Cuts Ribbon On Commercial Manufacturing Facility To Support Potential Launch Of Treatment For Peanut Allergy






Business Wire




Jun 7, 2017 8:00 AM EDT













 


















































  Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. (Nasdaq:AIMT), a biopharmaceutical company developing treatments for life-threatening food allergies, today hosted a ribbon-cutting ceremony to celebrate the completion of its commercial manufacturing facility in Clearwater, Florida. The facility will produce AR101, Aimmune's investigational biologic oral immunotherapy for desensitization of patients with peanut allergy, which is currently in Phase 3 clinical studies.  The new manufacturing facility contains more than 20,000 square feet of space and will handle full-scale cGMP (current Good Manufacturing Practices) commercial production of AR101 in anticipation of potential regulatory approvals. It will also supply future clinical trials of AR101 as well as trials of future product candidates. The facility includes state-of-the-art air-handling systems and equipment, which will prevent cross contamination of allergens from one suite to another, along with controls and management systems to ensure safety and compliance with U.S. and European pharmaceutical manufacturing regulations.  "Our work in 2017 has been intensely focused on the two critical paths of drug development — manufacturing and clinical development," said Aimmune CEO Stephen Dilly, M.B.B.S., Ph.D. "The completion of this world-class commercial manufacturing facility is a significant milestone. Next, we will complete qualification and validation activities and scale up to full functionality, so by early 2018 we will have the capacity to manufacture approximately 450 million capsules of AR101 per year. Meanwhile, on the clinical path, we are fast approaching completion of the up-dosing phase of PALISADE, and the RAMSES trial is underway, to be followed soon by the ARTEMIS trial in Europe. These are all timely and essential steps toward potentially being able to offer an approved treatment for patients with peanut allergy."  About Aimmune Therapeutics  Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc., is a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company developing treatments for life-threatening food allergies. The company's Characterized Oral Desensitization Immuno Therapy (CODIT™) approach is intended to achieve meaningful levels of protection by desensitizing patients with defined, precise amounts of key allergens. Aimmune's first investigational biologic product using CODIT™, AR101 for the treatment of peanut allergy, has received the FDA's Breakthrough Therapy Designation for the desensitization of peanut-allergic patients 4-17 years of age and is currently being evaluated in Phase 3 clinical trials. For more information, please see www.aimmune.com.  Forward-Looking Statements  Statements contained in this press release regarding matters that are not historical facts are "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Because such statements are subject to risks and uncertainties, actual results may differ materially from those expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. Such statements include, but are not limited to, statements regarding: Aimmune's expectations for its commercial manufacturing facility for AR101, including expectations that the facility will be cGMP compliant, capable of producing commercial supplies of AR101 and clinical supplies for additional product candidates, prevent cross-contamination of allergens and produce approximately 450 million capsules of AR101 per year; Aimmune's expectations that qualification and validation activities at the new manufacturing facility will be completed in early 2018; Aimmune's expectation that completion of the up-dosing phase of its PALISADE trial of AR101 will occur soon; Aimmune's expectation that its ARTEMIS trial of AR101 will begin soon; Aimmune's expectation that AR101 may receive regulatory approvals in the United States and Europe; Aimmune's expectations regarding the potential benefits of AR101; and Aimmune's expectations regarding potential applications of the CODIT™ approach to treating life-threatening food allergies. Risks and uncertainties that contribute to the uncertain nature of the forward-looking statements include: the expectation that Aimmune will need additional funds to finance its operations; the company's ability to initiate and/or complete clinical trials; the unpredictability of the regulatory process; the possibility that Aimmune's clinical trials will not be successful; Aimmune's dependence on the success of AR101; the company's reliance on third parties for the manufacture of the company's product candidates; possible regulatory developments in the United States and foreign countries; and the company's ability to attract and retain senior management personnel. These and other risks and uncertainties are described more fully in Aimmune's most recent filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including its Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2017. All forward-looking statements contained in this press release speak only as of the date on which they were made. Aimmune undertakes no obligation to update such statements to reflect events that occur or circumstances that exist after the date on which they were made.  



 








 










































If you liked this article you might like













5 Breakout Stocks to Buy for Big Gains
These stocks look ready to break out and trade higher from current levels.



Roberto Pedone

Nov 20, 2015 8:05 AM EST
























5 Stocks Ready for Breakouts
These stocks look ready to break out and trade higher from current levels.



Roberto Pedone

Sep 4, 2015 6:18 AM EDT








































 











Trending


AMD's Strong Guidance Points to Share Gains and More Could Be On the Way


Apple Moving Closer to Selling an American Made $1,000 iPhone, Trump Hints


No Good Stock Left Behind: Cramer's 'Mad Money' Recap (Tuesday 7/25/17)


Advanced Micro Devices Could Explode Another 17% Within Hours: Chart


Facebook's Q2 Results Should Make Snap CEO Evan Spiegel Wish He Had Accepted a $3B Buyout Offer











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 































Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. - AIMT - Stock Price Today - Zacks









 




























 


Free Gift
	for Zacks.com visitors
 

		AIMT is down -1.59% today, but where's it headed in August?
 


   

 Privacy Policy

		No cost, no obligation to buy anything ever.
 


















 
Join

Sign In




Member Sign In


 Keep Me Signed In 
What does "Remember Me" do?
Forgot Password


Create a New Account







 




















 


You are being directed to ZacksTrade, a division of LBMZ Securities and licensed broker-dealer. ZacksTrade and Zacks.com are separate companies. The web link between the two companies is not a solicitation or offer to invest in a particular security or type of security. ZacksTrade does not endorse or adopt any particular investment strategy, any analyst opinion/rating/report or any approach to evaluating indiv idual securities.
If you wish to go to ZacksTrade, click OK. If you do not, click Cancel.
OK Cancel








Back to top








more

























 Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. (AIMT)
(Delayed Data from NSDQ)



$21.65 USD
21.65
175,214


                -0.35                (-1.59%)
              

Updated Jul 25, 2017 04:00 PM ET




Add to portfolio
 





Zacks Rank:



                                                 3-Hold     3     




Style Scores:



D Value | D Growth | C Momentum | F VGM                


The Style Scores are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style. 
The scores are based on the trading styles of Value, Growth, and Momentum. There's also a VGM Score ('V' for Value, 'G' for Growth and 'M' for Momentum), which combines the weighted average of the individual style scores into one score.


Value Score
A


Growth Score
A


Momentum Score
A


VGM Score
A


Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A, is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B in your personal trading style.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores





Industry Rank:



 Top 47%(125 out of 265) 
Industry: Medical - Biomedical and Genetics




View All Zacks #1 Ranked Stocks




Trades from
$1

 



This is our short term rating system that serves as a timeliness indicator for stocks over the next 1 to 3 months. How good is it? See rankings and related performance below. 



Zacks Rank
Definition
Annualized Return




1
Strong Buy
25.71%


2
Buy
18.12%


3
Hold
9.91%


4
Sell
5.49%


5
Strong Sell
2.29%


S&P
500
9.79%


 Zacks Rank Education - Learn about the Zacks Rank
Zacks Rank Home - Zacks Rank resources in one place
Zacks Premium - The only way to fully access the Zacks Rank


The Zacks Equity Research reports, or ZER for short, are our in-house, independently produced research reports.
The ever popular one-page Snapshot reports are generated for virtually every single Zacks Ranked stock. It's packed with all of the company's key stats and salient decision making information. Including the Zacks Rank, Zacks Industry Rank, Style Scores, the Price, Consensus & Surprise chart, graphical estimate analysis and how a stocks stacks up to its peers.
The detailed multi-page Analyst report does an even deeper dive on the company's vital statistics. In addition to all of the proprietary analysis in the Snapshot, the report also visually displays the four components of the Zacks Rank (Agreement, Magnitude, Upside and Surprise); provides a comprehensive overview of the company business drivers, complete with earnings and sales charts; a recap of their last earnings report; and a bulleted list of reasons to buy or sell the stock. It also includes an industry comparison table to see how your stock compares to its expanded industry, and the S&P 500.
Researching stocks has never been so easy or insightful as with the ZER Analyst and Snapshot reports.
Learn more about Zacks Equity Research reports
See more Zacks Equity Research reports



The Zacks Industry Rank assigns a rating to each of the 265 X (Expanded) Industries based on their average Zacks Rank.
An industry with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
The industry with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top industry (1 out of 265), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Industries. The industry with the worst average Zacks Rank (265 out of 265) would place in the bottom 1%.
        Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank  
Zacks Industry Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Industry Rank
        









Quote Overview
















Stock Activity



Open
22.17


Day Low
21.25


Day High
22.17


52 Wk Low
11.40


52 Wk High
27.31


Avg. Volume
199,953


Market Cap
1.11 B


Dividend
0.00 ( 0.00%)


Beta
-1.13





Key Earnings Data



Earnings ESP 
0.00%


Most Accurate Est
-0.64


Current Qtr Est
-0.64


Current Yr Est
-2.58


Exp Earnings Date
8/9/17


Prior Year EPS
-1.89


Exp EPS Growth (3-5yr)28.85%


Forward PE
NA


PEG Ratio
NA










Medical » Medical - Biomedical and Genetics





Zacks Earnings ESP (Expected Surprise Prediction) looks to find companies that have recently seen positive earnings estimate revision activity. The idea is that more recent information is, generally speaking, more accurate and can be a better predictor of the future, which can give investors an advantage in earnings season.
The technique has proven to be very useful for finding positive surprises. In fact, when combining a Zacks Rank #3 or better and a positive Earnings ESP, stocks produced a positive surprise 70% of the time, while they also saw 28.3% annual returns on average, according to our 10 year backtest.
    
Visit the Earnings ESP Center
See the Full List of Stocks To Beat Earnings





Research Report for AIMT



All Zacks’ Analyst Reports



News for AIMT

Zacks News for AIMT
Other News for AIMT



AVEO Pharmaceuticals (AVEO) Worth a Look: Stock Up 14.8%
07/10/17-7:20AM EST  Zacks

Aimmune Therapeutics (AIMT) Shares March Higher, Can It Continue?
06/30/17-5:04AM EST  Zacks

AIMT: What are Zacks experts saying now?

Zacks Private Portfolio Services

Dynavax Technologies (DVAX) Catches Eye: Stock Gains 6.6%
06/21/17-7:20AM EST  Zacks

Exact Sciences (EXAS) Shows Strength: Stock Gains 11.7%
06/01/17-7:20AM EST  Zacks

Should You Get Rid of Aimmune Therapeutics (AIMT) Now?
04/11/17-7:43AM EST  Zacks


More Zacks News for AIMT




Biotech Forum Daily Digest: Sector Meanders In Front Of Earnings
07/25/17-1:30AM EST  Seeking Alpha

Aimmune Banks On Food Allergies, Study Expected To Show Positive Results
07/19/17-4:15AM EST  Seeking Alpha

Aimmune Therapeutics Enrolls First Patient in ARTEMIS (ARC010) European Phase 3 Clinical Trial of AR101 for the Treatment of Peanut Allergy
07/05/17-8:00AM EST  Business Wire

Aimmune Therapeutics Stock Sees Short Interest Move 10.8% Higher
06/27/17-12:45PM EST  Market News Video

Interesting AIMT Put And Call Options For August 18th
06/26/17-9:45AM EST  Stock Options Channel


More Other News for AIMT





Premium Research for AIMT





Zacks Rank


 Hold 3



Zacks Industry Rank
 Top 47%(125 out of 265)


Zacks Sector Rank
 Bottom 25% (12  out of 16) 



Style Scores

D Value | D Growth | C Momentum | F VGM




Earnings ESP


0.00%



Research Report for AIMT

Snapshot





This is our short term rating system that serves as a timeliness indicator for stocks over the next 1 to 3 months. How good is it? See rankings and related performance below. 



Zacks Rank
Definition
Annualized Return




1
Strong Buy
25.71%


2
Buy
18.12%


3
Hold
9.91%


4
Sell
5.49%


5
Strong Sell
2.29%


S&P
500
9.79%



Zacks Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Rank
Zacks Rank Home - All Zacks Rank resources in one place
Zacks Premium - The only way to get access to the Zacks Rank


The Style Scores  are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style.
The scores are based on the trading styles of Value, Growth, and Momentum. There's also a VGM Score ('V' for Value, 'G' for Growth and 'M' for Momentum), which combines the weighted average of the individual style scores into one score.



Value Score
A


Growth Score
A


Momentum Score
A


VGM Score
A



Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A, is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B in your personal trading style.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Zacks Industry Rank assigns a rating to each of the 265 X (Expanded) Industries based on their average Zacks Rank.
An industry with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
The industry with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top industry (1 out of 265), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Industries. The industry with the worst average Zacks Rank (265 out of 265) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank  
Zacks Industry Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Industry Rank



The Zacks Sector Rank assigns a rating to each of the 16 Sectors based on their average Zacks Rank.
A sector with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
Zacks Sector Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank 
The sector with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top sector (1 out of 16), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Sectors. The sector with the worst average Zacks Rank (16 out of 16) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank 
Zacks Sector Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank



The Zacks Equity Research reports, or ZER for short, are our in-house, independently produced research reports.
The ever popular one-page Snapshot reports are generated for virtually every single Zacks Ranked stock. It's packed with all of the company's key stats and salient decision making information. Including the Zacks Rank, Zacks Industry Rank, Style Scores, the Price, Consensus & Surprise chart, graphical estimate analysis and how a stocks stacks up to its peers.
The detailed multi-page Analyst report does an even deeper dive on the company's vital statistics. In addition to all of the proprietary analysis in the Snapshot, the report also visually displays the four components of the Zacks Rank (Agreement, Magnitude, Upside and Surprise); provides a comprehensive overview of the company business drivers, complete with earnings and sales charts; a recap of their last earnings report; and a bulleted list of reasons to buy or sell the stock. It also includes an industry comparison table to see how your stock compares to its expanded industry, and the S&P 500.
Researching stocks has never been so easy or insightful as with the ZER Analyst and Snapshot reports.
Learn more about Zacks Equity Research reports
See more Zacks Equity Research reports


Zacks Earnings ESP (Expected Surprise Prediction) looks to find companies that have recently seen positive earnings estimate revision activity. The idea is that more recent information is, generally speaking, more accurate and can be a better predictor of the future, which can give investors an advantage in earnings season.
The technique has proven to be very useful for finding positive surprises. In fact, when combining a Zacks Rank #3 or better and a positive Earnings ESP, stocks produced a positive surprise 70% of the time, while they also saw 28.3% annual returns on average, according to our 10 year backtest.
    
Visit the Earnings ESP Center
See the Full List of Stocks To Beat Earnings


This is our short term rating system that serves as a timeliness indicator for stocks over the next 1 to 3 months. How good is it? See rankings and related performance below. 



Zacks Rank
Definition
Annualized Return




1
Strong Buy
25.71%


2
Buy
18.12%


3
Hold
9.91%


4
Sell
5.49%


5
Strong Sell
2.29%


S&P
500
9.79%



Zacks Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Rank
Zacks Rank Home - All Zacks Rank resources in one place
Zacks Premium - The only way to fully access the Zacks Rank


The Zacks Industry Rank assigns a rating to each of the 265 X (Expanded) Industries based on their average Zacks Rank.
An industry with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
The industry with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top industry (1 out of 265), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Industries. The industry with the worst average Zacks Rank (265 out of 265) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank  
Zacks Industry Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Industry Rank



The Zacks Sector Rank assigns a rating to each of the 16 Sectors based on their average Zacks Rank.
A sector with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
Zacks Sector Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank 
The sector with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top sector (1 out of 16), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Sectors. The sector with the worst average Zacks Rank (16 out of 16) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank 
Zacks Sector Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank



The Style Scores are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style. 
The three scores are based on the trading styles of Growth, Value, and Momentum.


Growth Score
A


Value Score
A


Momentum Score
A


Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Style Scores  are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style.
The scores are based on the trading styles of Value, Growth, and Momentum. There's also a VGM Score ('V' for Value, 'G' for Growth and 'M' for Momentum), which combines the weighted average of the individual style scores into one score.



Value Score
A


Growth Score
A


Momentum Score
A


VGM Score
A



Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A, is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B in your personal trading style.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Zacks Equity Research reports, or ZER for short, are our in-house, independently produced research reports.
The ever popular one-page Snapshot reports are generated for virtually every single Zacks Ranked stock. It's packed with all of the company's key stats and salient decision making information. Including the Zacks Rank, Zacks Industry Rank, Style Scores, the Price, Consensus & Surprise chart, graphical estimate analysis and how a stocks stacks up to its peers.
The detailed multi-page Analyst report does an even deeper dive on the company's vital statistics. In addition to all of the proprietary analysis in the Snapshot, the report also visually displays the four components of the Zacks Rank (Agreement, Magnitude, Upside and Surprise); provides a comprehensive overview of the company business drivers, complete with earnings and sales charts; a recap of their last earnings report; and a bulleted list of reasons to buy or sell the stock. It also includes an industry comparison table to see how your stock compares to its expanded industry, and the S&P 500.
Researching stocks has never been so easy or insightful as with the ZER Analyst and Snapshot reports.
Learn more about Zacks Equity Research reports
See more Zacks Equity Research reports

(  = Change in last 30 days) 
View All Zacks Rank #1 Strong Buys





Premium Research: Industry Analysis



Top Peers
Symbol
Zacks Rank




Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc.
AIMT



Audentes Therapeutics, Inc.
BOLD



BIOVERATIV INC
BIVV



Enzo Biochem, Inc.
ENZ



Exelixis, Inc.
EXEL



Strongbridge Biopharma PLC
SBBP



Vertex Pharmaceuticals Incorporated
VRTX




See all Medical - Biomedical and Genetics Peers


 








Price and EPS Surprise Chart














1 Month
3 Months
YTD





Interactive Chart | Fundamental Chart



Billion Dollar Secret



Company Summary
Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. is a biopharmaceutical company which is engaged in the development of desensitization treatments for peanut and other food allergies. The Company's characterized oral desensitization immunotherapy includes AR101, a product for the treatment of peanut allergy in children and adults which is in clinical trial stage. Aimmune Therapeutics, Inc. is headquartered in Brisbane, California.   

















 





















 Cadista Holdings Inc. (Form: SC 13E3/A, Received: 12/05/2014 06:01:27) 













	 


	UNITED STATES

	SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION



	WASHINGTON,
	D.C. 20549


	____________________________


	 


	SCHEDULE 13E-3


	 


	RULE 13E-3 TRANSACTION STATEMENT UNDER

	SECTION 13(E) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934

	(Amendment No. 1)


	 


	____________________________


	 



	CADISTA HOLDINGS INC.



	 


	(Name of the Issuer)


	 


	____________________________


	 



	Cadista Holdings Inc.



	 


	(Names of Persons Filing
	Statement)


	 


	____________________________



	Common Stock



	 


	(Title of Class of Securities)


	 



	 




	127531 101



	 


	(CUSIP Number of Class of Securities)


	 


	 


	Kamal Mandan, Chief Financial Officer

	Cadista Holdings Inc.

	207 Kiley Drive

	Salisbury, Maryland 21801

	(410) 860-8500


	 


	(Name, address, and telephone numbers of
	person authorized to receive

	notices and communications on behalf of the persons filing statement)


	 


	With a copy to:


	 


	Rajiv Khanna, Esq.

	Seyfarth Shaw LLP

	620 Eighth Avenue

	New York, New York 10018

	(212) 218-3391


	 


	and


	 


	Esteban A. Ferrer, Esq.

	Seyfarth Shaw LLP

	620 Eighth Avenue

	New York, New York 10018

	(212) 218-3340


	 


	This statement is filed in connection with (check the appropriate
	box):


	 








	¨




	a. The filing of solicitation materials or an information statement subject to Regulation 14A, Regulation 14C or Rule 13e-3(c)
	under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.










	¨




	b. The filing of a registration statement under the Securities Act of 1933.










	x




	c. A tender offer.










	¨




	d. None of the above.




	Check the following box if the soliciting materials or information
	statement referred to in checking box (a) are preliminary copies:


	¨




	 


	Check the following box if the filing is a final amendment reporting
	the results of the transaction:


	¨




	 


	Calculation of Filing Fee


	 






	Transaction
	valuation*






	Amount
	of filing fee**






	 



	$33,253,770



	 



	$3,865.00



	 









	*




	The transaction valuation is estimated solely for purposes of calculating the filing fee. The calculation assumes the purchase of all outstanding shares of common stock, par value $0.001 per share (the “

	Common Stock

	”), of Cadista Holdings Inc., a Delaware corporation, at a purchase price of $1.60 per share, net to the seller in cash, other than shares of Common Stock owned by Jubilant Pharma Limited, a corporation organized under the laws of Singapore or its affiliates (including Jubilant Generics Inc., a Delaware corporation).  As of November 13, 2014, there were 117,797,180 shares of Common Stock outstanding of which 97,043,574 are owned by Parent and its subsidiaries.  As a result, this calculation assumes the purchase of 20,753,606 shares of Common Stock. The transaction value also includes the product of (i) the excess, if any, of the offer price of $1.60 over the per-share exercise price of options to purchase shares of Common Stock that are currently outstanding and (ii) 749,547, the estimated number of shares of Common Stock subject to such options that are currently outstanding.






	**




	The filing fee was determined by multiplying
	the transaction value by the filing fee of $116.20 per one million dollars of transaction value, in accordance with Rule 0-11 of
	the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.  


	 






	x

	Check the box if any part of the fee is offset as provided by Rule 0-11(a)(2) and identify the filing with which the offsetting
	fee was previously paid. Identify the previous filing by registration statement number, or the Form or Schedule and the date of
	its filing.


	 






	Amount Previously Paid:


	$3,865.00




	Form or Registration No.:


	Schedule TO (File No. 005-86651)




	Filing Party:


	Jubilant Generics Inc.




	Date Filed:


	November 13, 2014




	 



	Neither the Securities and Exchange
	Commission nor any state securities commission has: approved or disapproved of the transaction contemplated herein; passed upon
	the merits or fairness of such transaction; or passed upon the adequacy or accuracy of the disclosure in this document. Any representation
	to the contrary is a criminal offense.



	 








	 









	 








	 


	INTRODUCTION


	 


	This Amendment No.
	1 (this “

	Amendment

	”) amends and supplements the Transaction Statement on Schedule 13E-3 (the “

	Schedule
	13E-3

	”) filed on November 17, 2014, which relates to the tender offer (the “

	Offer

	”) by Jubilant Generics
	Inc., a Delaware corporation (the “

	Purchaser

	”), and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Jubilant Pharma Holdings Inc.,
	a Delaware corporation (“

	JPH

	”) and an indirect wholly owned subsidiary of Jubilant Pharma Limited, a corporation
	organized under the laws of Singapore (“

	Parent

	,” and a direct wholly owned subsidiary of Jubilant Life Sciences
	Ltd., a corporation organized under the laws of India (“

	JLL

	” or “

	Jubilant Life Sciences

	”)),
	to purchase all issued and outstanding shares of common stock, par value $0.001 per share (the “

	Shares

	”), of
	Cadista Holdings Inc., a Delaware corporation (“

	Cadista

	” or the “

	Company

	”), that are not
	already owned by Parent and its subsidiaries at a price of $1.60 per Share, net to the seller in cash, without interest and less
	any required withholding taxes, and on the other terms and subject to the other conditions specified in the Offer to Purchase,
	dated November 13, 2014 (the “

	Offer to Purchase

	”), and in the related Letter of Transmittal, each as originally
	filed with the Tender Offer Statement and Rule 13E-3 Transaction Statement under the cover of Schedule TO by Purchaser, Parent,
	JPH and JLL with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the “

	SEC

	”) on November 13, 2014 (the “

	Schedule
	TO

	”), and as amended by Amendment No. 1 to the Schedule TO, filed on December 3, 2014 (the “

	Schedule TO Amendment

	”).
	This Amendment is being filed by the Company, the issuer of the Shares. Parent, JPH, and Purchaser are collectively referred to
	herein as the “

	Purchaser Group

	.”


	 


	In response to the
	Offer, the Company filed a Solicitation/Recommendation Statement on Schedule 14D-9 on November 13, 2014 and an Amendment No. 1
	to such Schedule 14D-9 on December 4, 2014 (collectively, the “

	Schedule 14D-9

	”). The information contained in
	Schedule 14D-9 and the Offer to Purchase, including all schedules, annexes and exhibits thereto, copies of which are attached as
	exhibits to the Schedule 13E-3, is expressly incorporated by reference to the extent such information is required in response to
	the items of the Schedule 13E-3, and is supplemented by the information specifically provided herein. The responses to each item
	in the Schedule 13E-3 and this Amendment are qualified in their entirety by the information contained in Schedule 14D-9 and the
	Offer to Purchase. All information contained in the Schedule 13E-3 and this Amendment concerning the Company, the Purchaser Group
	and JLL has been provided by such person and not by any other person.


	 


	The information in
	the Schedule 13E-3 is incorporated in this Amendment by reference to all of the applicable items of the Schedule 13E-3, except
	that such information is hereby amended and supplemented to the extent specifically provided in this Amendment. Capitalized terms
	used herein and not defined shall have the meaning ascribed to such terms in the Schedule 14D-9 and Schedule 13E-3.


	 


	The Schedule 13E-3
	is hereby amended and supplemented as follows:


	 


	Item 8. Fairness of the Transaction


	 


	(b)

	Factors Considered
	in Determining Fairness

	.


	 







	2










	 








	 


	The following language
	is hereby inserted at the end of Item 8(b):


	 


	The information
	set forth in the following sections of the Offer to Purchase, as amended by the Schedule TO Amendment, are incorporated by reference:
	“What does the Special Committee and Cadista’s Board of Directors think of the Offer?” and “What is your
	position as to the fairness of the Offer and Merger” of the Summary Term Sheet; “Special Factors-Section 3-The Recommendation
	by Cadista’s Special Committee and Cadista’s Board of Directors”; and “Special Factors-Section 4-Position
	of the Purchaser Group and Jubilant Life Sciences Regarding Fairness of the Offer and the Merger.”


	 


	The information
	set forth in Schedule 14D-9 under “Item 4. The Solicitation or Recommendation—Background of the Offer” is incorporated
	herein by reference, which addresses the factors listed in subsections (c), (d) and (e) of Item 1014 of Regulation M-A. Other than
	the Committee described therein, the Board of Directors did not appoint an “unaffiliated representative” for purposes
	of acting on behalf of the unaffiliated security holders.


	 


	The factors described
	in subsections (i), (ii), (vi) and (viii) of Instruction 2 to Item 1014 of Regulation M-A are respectively: current market prices;
	historical market prices; purchase prices paid in previous purchases disclosed in response to Item 1002(f); and firm offers of
	which the subject company or affiliate is aware made by any unaffiliated person, other than the filing persons, during the past
	two years. As described in the Offer to Purchase, although the Shares have been registered under the Securities Exchange Act of
	1934 since August 2011, a public trading market for the Shares has yet to develop. Therefore, we do not believe that current or
	historical market prices are relevant or material since to our knowledge there are none. Similarly, the Company and its affiliates
	have not purchased any of the Shares in the past two years (which would trigger the Item 1002(f) disclosure obligation) and the
	Filing Person is not aware of any firm offers made by any unaffiliated person during the past two years. Accordingly, we also believe
	these factors are not relevant or material.


	 


	Additionally,
	the factors described in subsections (iii) – (v) of Instruction 2 to Item 1014 of Regulation M-A that were considered by
	the Committee are discussed on pages 38-39 of the Offer to Purchase under the Section “Special Factors-Section 4-Position
	of the Purchaser Group and Jubilant Life Sciences Regarding Fairness of the Offer and the Merger.”


	 


	Item 9. Reports, Opinions, Appraisals
	and Negotiations


	 


	(c)

	Availability
	of Documents

	.


	 


	The following language
	is hereby inserted prior to the last sentence of Item 9(c):


	 


	A copy of a written
	presentation provided by CS to the Committee in connection with an October 17, 2014 meeting is attached as Exhibit (c)(4). Such
	presentation and the discussion that took place at such meeting is summarized in the following sections of the Schedule 14D-9,
	which are incorporated herein by reference: “Item 4. The Solicitation or Recommendation—Background of the Offer”
	and “Item 4. The Solicitation or Recommendation—Opinion of Financial Advisor.”


	 









	3










	 






	 


	A copy of a written
	presentation provided by CS to the Committee in connection with a September 11, 2014 meeting is attached as Exhibit (c)(5). Such
	report and the discussion that took place at such meeting is described in the following sections of the Schedule 14D-9, which are
	incorporated herein by reference: “Item 4. The Solicitation or Recommendation—Background of the Offer” and “Item
	4. The Solicitation or Recommendation—Opinion of Financial Advisor.”


	 


	Item 16. Exhibits


	 


	Item 16 is amended to include the following
	additional exhibits, which are filed herewith:



	 







	Exhibit No

	.





	Description






	(c)(4)


	Presentation of Cassel Salpeter & Co., LLC, dated October 17, 2014.




	(c)(5)


	Presentation of Cassel Salpeter & Co., LLC, dated September 11, 2014.





	  








	4










	 






	 


	SIGNATURE


	 


	After due inquiry and
	to the best of my knowledge and belief, I certify that the information set forth in this statement is true, complete and correct.


	 


	 Dated: December 4, 2014


	 






	 



	Cadista Holdings Inc.





	 


	By:

	/s/ Kamal Mandan                                                      





	 


	Name: Kamal Mandan




	 


	Title: Chief Financial Officer






	 









	5







	 


	 


	 










	 



	Exhibit (c)(4)



	 


	 



	 








	 









	 






	 


	 



	 


	 








	 









	 










	 


	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	 


	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	   








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	  








	 









	 






	 


	 



	 








	 









	 






	 


	 



	 








	 









	 






	 


	 



	 








	 









	 






	 


	 



	 








	 









	 






	 


	 



	 








	 









	 






	 


	 



	 








	 









	 






	 


	 



	 








	 






	 









	Exhibit (c)(5)



	 




	 




	 




	 











	 









	 







	  




	 





	 




	  











	 









	 







	 



	 



	 








	 









	 







	 


	 








	 









	 







	 


	 


	 


	 








	 









	 






	 



	 




	 








	 









	 









	 


	 








	 









	 









	 


	  








	 









	 









	 




	 








	 









	 






	 



	 


	 








	 









	 







	 


	 


	 








	 









	 









	 




	 








	 









	 









	 




	 






	 









	 









	 




	 








	 









	 









	 


	 










	 









	 









	 


	 


	 








	 









	 






	 

	 




	 








	 









	 






	  



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 









	 









	 




	 


	 








	 









	 






	  



	 


	 


	 








	 









	 








	 


	 



	 


	 








	 









	 






	  



	 


	 


	 








	 









	 









	 




	 








	 









	 









	 




	 








	 









	 






	 


	 



	 








	 









	 






	 



	 


	 










	 









	 






	 

	 




	 








	 









	 






	 



	 


	 


	 








	 









	 









	 


	 










	 






	 


	 


	 



	 








10-K: AIMMUNE THERAPEUTICS, INC. - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

21,613
+100.26
+0.47%






Nasdaq

6,412
+1.37
+0.02%






S&P 500

2,477
+7.22
+0.29%









10:13 P.M. ET


                                  One version of GOP health-care bills fails in Senate vote
                                





 
9:28 P.M. ET


Updated
      George Clooney and Angelina Jolie’s directorial projects could be the most sought-after tickets at TIFF
                                





 
8:40 P.M. ET


                                  John McCain gives Trump a win, then gives Senate an earful
                                





 
8:20 P.M. ET


Updated
      PayPal earnings: Partnerships help, but are benefits already priced in?
                                





 
7:47 P.M. ET


Updated
      AMD puts Intel in the crosshairs with fast-and-cheap Threadripper chip
                                





 
7:39 P.M. ET


                                  AMD earnings give investors what they wanted, now it must deliver
                                





 
7:28 P.M. ET


Updated
      How about never? Avoid taking meetings with these troublesome co-workers 
                                





 
7:23 P.M. ET


                                  House passes bill hitting Russia with new sanctions
                                





 
7:04 P.M. ET


                                  WSJ Interview: Trump Doesn't Rule Out Firing Sessions
                                





 
7:01 P.M. ET


                                  Former Trump campaign chief Manafort strikes deal to avoid public testimony
                                





 
6:45 P.M. ET


Updated
      One depressing reason millions of people are locked out of the American Dream
                                





 
6:44 P.M. ET


Updated
      House votes to prevent disgruntled customers from being able to sue their bank
                                





 
6:03 P.M. ET


Updated
      This quant pro and card counter says gambling can make you a better investor
                                





 
6:01 P.M. ET


Updated
      Bitcoin, digital currencies retreat from records
                                





 
5:42 P.M. ET


                                  This is what it will take for bitcoin to become a legit currency 
                                





 
5:36 P.M. ET


Updated
      Emerging markets fund manager favors Bangladesh and Kenya, and avoids Korea and Taiwan
                                





 
5:35 P.M. ET


                                  USS Thunderbolt Fires Warning Shots at Iranian Vessel in Gulf
                                





 
5:32 P.M. ET


Updated
      Here’s one Trump fan who might make you some money
                                





 
5:29 P.M. ET


                                  Chegg shares sink after second-quarter loss 
                                





 
5:24 P.M. ET


                                  McCain Returns to Senate With Strong Comments on Health Care
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-K: AIMMUNE THERAPEUTICS, INC.
    








    By

Published: Mar 15, 2017 5:27 p.m. ET

Share


















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.  You should read the following discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations in conjunction with our audited financial statements and related notes included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. This discussion and other parts of this Annual Report on Form 10-K contain forward-looking statements that involve risks and uncertainties, such as statements of our plans, objectives, expectations and intentions. Our actual results could differ materially from those discussed in these forward-looking statements. Factors that could cause or contribute to such differences include, but are not limited to, those discussed in the section of this Annual Report of on Form 10-K titled "Risk Factors." Except as may be required by law, we assume no obligation to update these forward-looking statements or the reasons that results could differ from these forward-looking statements.  Overview  We are a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company advancing a new therapeutic approach, including the development of proprietary product candidates, for the treatment of peanut and other food allergies. It is estimated that over 30 million people in the United States and Europe have a food allergy, with peanut allergy being the most prevalent and most commonly associated with severe outcomes and life-threatening events. There are currently no approved medical therapies to cure food allergies or prevent their symptoms. Patients with food allergies are typically counseled to practice strict dietary avoidance. When accidental exposure to food allergens invokes a serious allergic reaction, rescue therapies, such as antihistamines or injectable epinephrine, are the only recourse available. Our therapeutic approach, which we refer to as Characterized Oral Desensitization ImmunoTherapy, or CODITTM, is designed to desensitize patients to food allergens and thereby reduce the risk of having an allergic reaction upon accidental exposure, or reduce symptom severity should an allergic reaction occur. CODIT is intended to reduce meaningfully the burden and anxiety experienced by food-allergic patients and their families.  Our lead CODIT product candidate, AR101, is an investigational biologic for the treatment of patients with peanut allergy, which affects approximately three million patients in the United States and three million patients in Europe. AR101 has received Fast Track and Breakthrough Therapy Designations for the treatment of patients 4-17 years from the United States Food and Drug Administration, or FDA. Our initial target patient population is in children and adolescents in the 4-17 age group, which we estimate will reach approximately 1.6 million patients in the United States alone by 2018. We have completed a double-blind placebo-controlled Phase 2 trial of AR101 in 55 patients ages 4-21 years, have analyzed longer-term safety and efficacy data from our ongoing open-label Phase 2 trial and have received feedback from regulatory authorities, including the FDA and the European Medicines Agency, or EMA, providing guidance on our Phase 3 program. In late 2015, we initiated a Phase 3 registration trial of AR101 in the United States, Canada and Europe, which we refer to as the PALISADE (Peanut Allergy Oral Immunotherapy Study of AR101 for Desensitization in Children and Adults) trial. We completed global enrollment of 554 patients ages 4-49 in November 2016 and anticipate completing the PALISADE trial around year-end 2017. We have begun to enroll eligible patients who have completed PALISADE into a related open-label Phase 3 roll-over trial, which we refer to as the ARC004 trial. We expect to begin enrolling a real-world experience trial of AR101 in the United States and Canada in patients ages 4-17 in the second quarter of 2017, which we refer to as the RAMSES (Real-World AR101 Market-Supporting Experience Study in Peanut Allergic Children Ages 4-17 Years) trial. In addition, we expect to initiate a European trial in the middle of 2017 designed with a higher efficacy bar in the same age group, which we refer to as the ARTEMIS (AR101 Trial in Europe Measuring oral Immunotherapy Success) trial. Based on discussions with the FDA in the beginning of 2017, we anticipate that the safety database for a Biologics License Application, or BLA, will need to include data from at least 600 patients ages 4-17 treated with AR101 at the target maintenance dose of 300 mg per day. We expect to meet this requirement with patients from the PALISADE, ARC004 and RAMSES trials. In Europe, we expect that data from the PALISADE, ARC004 and ARTEMIS trials will form the basis for a Marketing Authorization Application, or MAA, filing with the European Medicines Agency, or EMA. We expect to have topline data from our PALISADE trial around year-end 2017 and intend to file a BLA in the United States and an MAA in the European Union in late 2018.  We maintain worldwide commercial rights to all of our product candidates, including AR101 and, if approved, currently intend to commercialize in the United States and Europe with our own specialty sales force calling on allergists in the United States and allergy-focused clinicians in major European markets.  Since commencing our operations in 2011, substantially all of our efforts have been focused on research, development and the advancement of our lead CODIT product candidate, AR101. We have not generated any revenue from product sales and, as a result, we have incurred significant losses. We incurred net losses of $80.8 million, $35.8 million, and $11.1 million for the years ended December 31, 2106, 2015, and 2014, respectively. As of December 31, 2016 our accumulated deficit was $134.2 million. We expect to continue to incur losses for the foreseeable future, and we anticipate these losses will increase as we continue our development of, seek regulatory approval for, and begin to commercialize AR101, and as we develop other product candidates.  We do not expect to generate revenue from product sales unless and until we successfully complete development of, obtain regulatory approval for, and begin to commercialize one or more of our product candidates, which we expect will take a number of years and is subject to significant uncertainty. Accordingly, we anticipate that we will need to raise additional capital to fund our future operations. Until such time that we can generate substantial revenue from product sales, if ever, we expect to finance our operating activities through a combination of equity offerings and debt financings and we may seek to raise additional capital through strategic collaborations. However, we may be unable to raise additional funds or enter into such arrangements when needed on favorable terms, or at all, which would have a negative impact on our financial condition and could force us to delay, limit, reduce or terminate our development programs or commercialization efforts or grant to others rights to develop or market product candidates that we would otherwise prefer to develop and market ourselves. Failure to receive additional funding could cause us to cease operations, in part or in full. Furthermore, even if we believe we have sufficient funds for our current or future operating plans, we may seek additional capital due to favorable market conditions or strategic considerations.  We currently utilize contract manufacturers for all of our manufacturing activities. In June 2015, we entered into a lease for a manufacturing facility in Clearwater, Florida. We anticipate that this manufacturing facility will be operational by the end of 2017. We plan to continue to rely on the contract manufacturer that is located at the same site to manage the operations of this new manufacturing facility. Additionally, we currently utilized specialized clinical vendors, clinical trial sites, consultants, and clinical research organizations, or CROs, to ensure the proper and timely conduct of our clinical trials, and we do not yet have a sales organization. We expect to significantly increase our investment in costs relating to our manufacturing process and sales organization as we prepare for the filing of a BLA with the FDA and a MAA with the EMA and prepare for a possible commercial launch of AR101.  Recent Developments  Equity Investment and Strategic Collaboration  On November 3, 2016, we entered into a securities purchase agreement (the "Purchase Agreement") with Nestle Health Science US Holdings, Inc. ("Nestle Health Science"), pursuant to which we issued and sold 7,552,084 shares ("the Shares") of our common stock, par value $0.0001 to Nestle Health Science in a private placement at a price of $19.20 per share or aggregate cash purchase price of $145.0 million. The Shares represented 15.1% of our outstanding common stock after giving effect to the issuance of the shares upon closing. In connection with the closing of the sale and issuance of the Shares on November 23, 2016, we entered into a Registration Rights Agreement, and Standstill Agreement with Nestle Health Science.  In connection with the Purchase Agreement, on November 3, 2016, we entered into a Strategic Collaboration Agreement (the "Strategic Collaboration Agreement") with Nestec, Ltd., a limited company organized and existing under the laws of Switzerland ("Nestec"). Nestec and Nestle Health Science are affiliates of Swiss food and wellness company, Nestle S.A. Pursuant to the Strategic Collaboration Agreement, we and Nestec (through itself and one or more affiliated entities) agreed to collaborate with one another in connection with the development of our products, including by (i) sharing information relating to our activities directed towards the development of our products for the treatment of allergies to one or more particular types of food (the "Development Programs") and (ii) providing us access to Nestec's scientific, clinical, regulatory and commercial expertise relevant to such Development Programs. The Strategic Collaboration Agreement became effective upon the closing of the equity investment. We evaluated the Equity Purchase Agreement and Strategic Collaboration Agreement and determined that the equity purchase by Nestle Health Science was at fair value, and therefore, we accounted for the equity component under the Equity Purchase Agreement separately from the Strategic Collaboration Agreement. The collaboration is not deemed to be a revenue generating transaction and no accounting was required.  Critical Accounting Policies and Significant Judgments and Estimates  Our management's discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations is based on our consolidated financial statements, which have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, or GAAP, in the United States. The preparation of these consolidated financial statements requires us to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and the disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the consolidated financial statements, as well as the reported revenue generated and expenses incurred during the reporting periods. Our estimates are based on our historical experience and on various other factors that we believe are reasonable under the circumstances, the results of which form the basis for making judgments about the carrying value of assets and liabilities that are not readily apparent from other sources. Actual results may differ from these estimates under different assumptions or conditions. We believe that the accounting policies discussed below are critical to understanding our historical and future performance, as these policies relate to the more significant areas involving management's judgments and estimates. Our significant accounting policies are more fully described in Note 2 of Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.  Accrued Research and Development Costs  We record expenses for our research and development activities conducted by third-party service providers, which include the conduct of pre-clinical studies and clinical trials and contract manufacturing activities, based upon the estimated amount of services provided and work completed but not yet invoiced and in accordance with agreements established with these third-party service  providers. We include these costs in accrued liabilities in the consolidated balance sheets and within research and development expenses in the consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive loss. These costs are a significant component of our research and development expenses.  We estimate the amount of work completed through discussions with internal personnel and external service providers as to the progress or stage of completion of the services and the agreed-upon fee to be paid for such services. We make significant judgments and estimates in determining the accrued balance in each reporting period. As actual costs become known, we adjust our accrued estimates. Although we do not expect our estimates to be materially different from amounts actually incurred, our understanding of the status and timing of services performed, the number of patients enrolled and the rate of patient enrollment may vary from our estimates and could result in us reporting amounts that are too high or too low in any particular period. Our accrued expenses are dependent, in part, upon the receipt of timely and accurate reporting from clinical research organizations and other third-party service providers. To date, there have been no material differences from our accrued expenses to actual expenses.  Stock-Based Compensation  We recognize compensation costs related to stock options granted to employees and directors based on the estimated fair value of the awards on the date of grant, net of estimated forfeitures. We estimate the grant date fair value using the Black-Scholes option-pricing model. The grant date fair value of the stock-based awards is generally recognized on a straight-line basis over the requisite service period, which is generally the vesting period of the respective awards.  We recorded stock-based compensation expense of $12.6 million, $6.2 million and $0.1 million for the years ended December 31, 2016, 2015 and 2014, respectively.  Prior to our IPO, the fair value of our shares of common stock underlying the stock options was the responsibility of and determined by our Board of Directors, or the Board. Because there was no public market for our common stock, the Board determined the fair value of common stock at the time of grant of the option by considering a number of objective and subjective factors, including independent third-party valuations of our common stock, sales of convertible preferred stock to unrelated third parties, operating and financial performance, the lack of liquidity of our capital stock, and general and industry specific economic outlook, amongst other factors. Following our IPO, the market traded price of the shares of common stock underlying the stock options is the closing price of our stock as reported on The NASDAQ Global Select Market on the grant date.  In determining the fair value of the stock-based awards used to calculate stock-based compensation expense, we use the Black-Scholes option-pricing model and assumptions discussed below. Some of these inputs are subjective and require judgment to determine.   Expected Term. The expected term of stock options represents the weighted average period the stock options are expected to be outstanding. We have opted to use the simplified method for estimating the expected term as provided by the Securities and Exchange Commission Staff Accounting Bulletin, or SAB, 110 as our options grants are considered "plain vanilla". The simplified method calculates the expected term as the average time-to-vesting and the contractual life of the options. We plan to continue to use the simplified method under SAB 110 until we have sufficient exercise history as a publicly traded company.   Expected Volatility. The expected stock price volatility assumption was determined by examining the historical volatilities of a group of industry peers, as we have limited trading history for our common stock. Industry peers consist of several public companies in the biopharmaceutical industry with comparable characteristics including enterprise value, risk profiles and position within the industry. We intend to continue to consistently apply this process using the same or similar public companies until a sufficient amount of historical information regarding the volatility of our own common stock share price becomes available, or unless circumstances change such that the identified companies are no longer similar to us, in which case, more suitable companies whose share prices are publicly available would be utilized in the calculation.   Risk-Free Interest Rate. The risk-free interest rate is based on the implied yield available on U.S. Treasury zero-coupon issues in effect at the time of grant for periods corresponding with the expected term of the option.   Expected Dividend Yield. We have never paid dividends on our common stock and have no plans to pay dividends on our common stock. Therefore, we used an expected dividend yield of zero for all years presented.  The weighted-average assumptions used to estimate the fair value of stock options using the Black-Scholes option valuation model and the resulting weighted average grant date fair value of stock options granted were as follows:   Year Ended December 31, 2016 2015 2014 Expected volatility 74.46 % 74.14 % 79.62 % Risk-free interest rate 1.71 % 1.73 % 1.51 % Expected dividend yield - - - Expected term (in years) 6.03 5.99 4.65 Weighted average grant date fair value $ 10.53 $ 6.11 $ 0.09  In addition to the Black-Scholes assumptions, we estimate our forfeiture rate based on an analysis of our actual forfeitures and will continue to evaluate the adequacy of the forfeiture rate based on actual forfeiture experience, analysis of employee turnover behavior and other factors. The impact from any forfeiture rate adjustment would be recognized in full in the period of adjustment, and if the actual number of future forfeitures differs from our estimates, we might be required to record adjustments to stock-based compensation in future periods. We will continue to use judgment in evaluating the expected volatility, expected terms and forfeiture rates utilized for our stock-based compensation expense calculations on a prospective basis.  As of December 31, 2016, we had $27.3 million of unrecognized compensation expense related to unvested stock options, which is expected to be recognized over an estimated weighted-average period of 2.72 years. For stock option awards subject to ratable vesting, we recognize compensation cost on a straight-line basis over the service period for the entire award. In future periods, our stock-based compensation expense is expected to increase as a result of recognizing our existing unrecognized stock-based compensation for awards that will vest and as we issue additional stock-based awards to attract and retain our employees.  Income Taxes  We recognize deferred income taxes for temporary differences between the basis of assets and liabilities for financial statement and income tax purposes. We periodically evaluate the positive and negative evidence bearing upon realizability of our deferred tax assets. Based upon the weight of available evidence, which includes our historical operating performance, reported cumulative net losses since inception and difficulty in accurately forecasting our future results, we maintained a full valuation allowance on the net deferred tax assets. We intend to maintain a full valuation allowance on the federal and state deferred tax assets until sufficient positive evidence exists to support reversal of the valuation allowance.  As of December 31, 2016, we had generated net operating loss, or NOL, carryforwards for federal income tax purposes of $81.0 million and for California income tax purposes of $12.0 million. These federal and state NOL carryforwards will begin to expire in 2031, if not utilized. Our ability to utilize NOL carryforwards or other tax attributes, such as research tax credits, in any taxable year may be limited if we have experienced an ownership change under Section 382 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the Code. Following issuance of the Series B convertible preferred stock in January and February 2015, we performed a preliminary Section 382 analysis and believe that we experienced multiple ownership changes prior to June 30, 2015, and, as a result, such federal and state NOL carryforwards and our tax credits are subject to limitation. We have not performed a Section 382 analysis to evaluate whether or not we experienced an ownership change as a result of either our August 2015 IPO or the November 2016 equity investment by Nestle Health Science.  We record unrecognized tax benefits as liabilities and adjust these liabilities when our judgment changes as a result of the evaluation of new information not previously available. Because of the complexity of some of these uncertainties, the ultimate resolution may result in a payment that is materially different from our current estimate of the unrecognized tax benefit liabilities. These differences will be reflected as increases or decreases to deferred tax assets offset by a change to valuation allowance in the period in which new information is available.  Tax benefits from uncertain tax positions are recognized when it is more likely than not that the position will be sustained upon examination, including resolutions of any related appeals or litigation processes, based on technical merits. The amount recognized is measured as the largest amount of tax benefit that is greater than 50% likely of being realized upon effective settlement.  Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements Not Yet Adopted  In November 2016, the Financial Accounting Standards Board, or FASB, issued Accounting Standards Update, or ASU, 2016-18, Statement of Cash Flows - Restricted Cash (Topic 230), which establishes that the statement of cash flows will show the changes in cash, cash equivalents and amounts generally described as restricted cash. As a result, entities will no longer have to determine how to classify transfers to and from restricted cash within the statement of cash flows. An entity will be required to reconcile the total cash, cash equivalents and amounts generally described as restricted cash on the statement of cash flows to the amounts in the balance sheet, and disclose the nature of any restrictions on its cash, cash equivalents or amounts generally described as restricted cash. This guidance is effective for fiscal years, and interim periods within those years, beginning after December 31, 2017, and early adoption is permitted. We have not yet adopted ASU 2016-18, but we do not expect the standard to have a material impact on our financial statements and related disclosures.  In October 2016, the FASB, issued ASU, 2016-16, Income Taxes (Topic 740):  In August 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-15, Statement of Cash Flows (Topic 230): Classification of Certain Cash Receipts and Cash Payments, which will make eight targeted changes to how cash receipts and cash payments are presented and classified in the statement of cash flows. ASU 2016-15 is effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2017. ASU 2016-15 will require adoption on a retrospective basis. Early adoption is permitted. We are currently evaluating the impact that the adoption of ASU 2016-15 will have on our financial statements and related disclosures.  In June 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-13, Financial Instruments - Credit Losses (Topic 326): Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments, which requires measurement and recognition of expected credit losses for financial assets held. ASU 2016-13 modifies the other-than-temporary impairment model for available-for-sale debt securities and requires an estimate of expected credit losses when the fair value is below the amortized cost of the asset. ASU 2016-13 is effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2019 and interim periods within those fiscal years. Early adoption is permitted. We are currently evaluating the impact that the adoption of ASU 2016-13 will have on our financial statements and related disclosures.  In March 2016, the FASB, issued ASU 2016-09, Compensation-Stock Compensation (Topic 718) Improvements to Employee Share-Based Payment Accounting, which simplifies several aspects of accounting for share-based payment transactions including the income tax consequences, classification of awards as either equity or liabilities, classification on the statement of cash flows and accounting for forfeitures. The new standard is effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2016, and interim periods within those fiscal years with early adoption permitted. We do not expect the adoption of this new standard to have a material impact on our financial statements and related disclosures.  In February 2016, the FASB, issued ASU, No. 2016-02, Leases (Topic 842), which requires lessees to apply a dual approach, classifying leases as either finance or operating leases based on the principle of whether or not the lease is effectively a financed purchase by the lessee. This classification will determine whether lease expense is recognized based on an effective interest method or on a straight-line basis over the term of the lease. A lessee is also required to record a right-of-use asset and a lease liability for all leases with a term of greater than 12 months regardless of their classification. Leases with a term of 12 months or less will be accounted for similar to existing guidance for operating leases. The standard is effective for interim and annual periods beginning after December 15, 2018, with early adoption permitted. We are currently in the process of evaluating the impact the adoption of this new standard will have on our financial statements and related disclosures; however, since we are lessee to certain leases for property whose terms exceed twelve months, we expect to report assets and liabilities related to these leases on our financial statements that have not been previously reported, once we adopt ASU 2016-02.  Components of Results of Operations  Research and Development Expenses  The largest component of our total operating expenses has historically been our investment in research and development activities. Research and development expenses consist primarily of external-related expenses, employee-related expenses, stock-based compensation expense, and facilities and other costs, which include the following:   External-related expenses include costs incurred to conduct research, such as the discovery and development of our product candidates; costs related to the production of clinical supplies, including fees paid to contract manufacturers; fees paid to consultants and vendors, including . . .  Mar 15, 2017  (c) 1995-2017 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch




















Most Popular





The biggest dog in the Dow might soon break free





Here’s why Amazon, Facebook and the gang are not going to take down this market





AMD earnings: How did we get here?





S&P 500, Nasdaq finish at records as investors cheer earnings





Russell Gordy's Ranch Collection Across the American West




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 






















MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



Credit


Currency


Markets


Supermarkets


Textiles


Gas Prices




Airlines


Oil


Currencies


U.S. Stocks


Retail


Federal Reserve




U.S. Dollar


United Kingdom


Europe


European Markets


Energy Stocks


Copper






People in the news



Trump, Donald


Buffett, Warren


Hill, David


Rather, Dan


Brin, Sergey


King, David




Lewis, Michael


Perry, Rick


Berlusconi, Silvio


McCain, John


Musk, Elon


Carter, Jimmy




Obama, Barack


Clinton, Bill


Jackson, Michael


Bloomberg, Michael


Putin, Vladimir


Snow, John






Companies in the news



Miners


Connor


American International Group


Lilly (Eli) & Co.


Dow Chemical


DuPont




Apple Inc.


American Manufacturing


Ford Motor


General Motors


Jones


3M Co




Bank of America Corp.


Caterpillar Inc.


Dow Jones & Co.


Google Inc.


McDonald's Corp.


News Corp.






Organizations in the news



European Union


Consumers Union


General Assembly


Small Business Administration


European Central Bank


Nasdaq Stock Market




World Bank


World Trade Organization


Bank of England


Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Investment Company Institute


New York Stock Exchange




College Board


New York University


State University of New York


University of Massachusetts


University of Washington


Washington State University












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




10:16 PM EDT
July 25, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:14pOne version of GOP health-care bills fails in Senate vote
9:28pGeorge Clooney and Angelina Jolie’s directorial projects could be the most sought-after tickets at TIFF
8:41pJohn McCain gives Trump a win, then gives Senate an earful
8:20pPayPal earnings: Partnerships help, but are benefits already priced in?
7:47pAMD puts Intel in the crosshairs with fast-and-cheap Threadripper chip
7:40pAMD earnings give investors what they wanted, now it must deliver
7:29pHow about never? Avoid taking meetings with these troublesome co-workers 
7:23pHouse passes bill hitting Russia with new sanctions
7:04pWSJ Interview: Trump Doesn't Rule Out Firing Sessions
7:01pFormer Trump campaign chief Manafort strikes deal to avoid public testimony
6:46pOne depressing reason millions of people are locked out of the American Dream
6:45pHouse votes to prevent disgruntled customers from being able to sue their bank
6:04pThis quant pro and card counter says gambling can make you a better investor
6:01pBitcoin, digital currencies retreat from records
5:43pThis is what it will take for bitcoin to become a legit currency 
5:37pEmerging markets fund manager favors Bangladesh and Kenya, and avoids Korea and Taiwan
5:35pUSS Thunderbolt Fires Warning Shots at Iranian Vessel in Gulf
5:32pHere’s one Trump fan who might make you some money
5:30pChegg shares sink after second-quarter loss 
5:24pMcCain Returns to Senate With Strong Comments on Health Care
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,613.43

+100.26
+0.47%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,412.17

+1.37
+0.02%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.13

+7.22
+0.29%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft

































GoBoldly - Latest news and stories from the American biopharmaceutical industry

















      Skip to main content
    
















Explore the innovative research and technological breakthroughs of America's biopharmaceutical industry, and get to know the people behind the fight to prevent, treat, and cure disease.


















Our Fight


Our Mission


Our Companies













FOLLOW US






©2017 Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of America
950 F Street, NW Suite 300
Washington, DC 20004
202.835.3400 (P) | 202.835.3414 (F)
PhRMA.org Innovation.org
Privacy Policy Terms of Service


























AboutUS

Finding lifesaving medicines is a life's work – the work of 140,000 researchers who never say never. As well as the millions of patients who fight side by side with researchers in the battle for life, against whatever odds they face together.
Now is the time to put the accelerator to the floor. The best is yet to come – like advancements in personalized medicine and immunotherapy – and it's coming faster than we can imagine.
Welcome to the future of medicine. Where disease is no match for tenacity. No match for ingenuity. Where together, we go boldly.
DO NOT GO GENTLE
Today's breakthroughs are becoming tomorrow's medicines.
 Watch the Video 



























































DO NOT GO GENTLE

















DO NOT GO GENTLE





 Share
 Tweet
 Link
 Email
 Print







This is the most exciting time in the history of medicine. Millions of people around the world are benefiting from breakthrough treatments that save, extend and improve life.
Research, technology and genomics are coming together to create a platform that allows researchers to decipher the cause of disease as never before. Each advance opens new doors, new cures, new treatments.
And yet, it’s not enough.
"Today's breakthroughs become tomorrow's medicines." Tweet
Cures don’t appear on a schedule. In search of the unknowable, in search of curing the incurable, there is no one map, no singular template, no predictable milestones.
Finding lifesaving medicines is a life’s work – the work of thousands of researchers who never say never. It's also the work of millions of patients who fight side by side with researchers in the battle for life, against whatever odds they face together.
Now is the time to put the accelerator to the floor. The best is yet to come – like groundbreaking advances in immunotherapy and personalized medicine – where the once impossible is now reality.
Welcome to the future of medicine. Where disease is no match for tenacity. No match for ingenuity. Where together, we go boldly.
Dylan Thomas penned "Do not go gentle into that good night" in 1947, but the sentiment is as timely today as it ever was. Millions of Americans are battling serious illnesses, but they’re not alone in the fight. They have the support of thousands of biopharmaceutical researchers whose lives are dedicated to helping patients go boldly into longer, healthier, and more productive lives.
 










      RELATED NEWS
    



THE POWER OF MEDICINES
Saving lives and creating hope for the future.
VIEW THE GRAPHIC



DRIVING PERSONALIZED MEDICINE FORWARD
The biopharmaceutical industry is leading the charge in finding new medicines for patients.
VIEW THE GALLERY



TRANSLATING SCIENCE INTO NEW MEDICINES
The commitment it takes for researchers and scientists to achieve breakthroughs in medicine.
WATCH THE VIDEO





















 Share
 Tweet
 Link
 Email
 Print








































GoBoldly - Latest news and stories from the American biopharmaceutical industry

















      Skip to main content
    
















Explore the innovative research and technological breakthroughs of America's biopharmaceutical industry, and get to know the people behind the fight to prevent, treat, and cure disease.


















Our Fight


Our Mission


Our Companies













FOLLOW US






©2017 Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of America
950 F Street, NW Suite 300
Washington, DC 20004
202.835.3400 (P) | 202.835.3414 (F)
PhRMA.org Innovation.org
Privacy Policy Terms of Service


























AboutUS

Finding lifesaving medicines is a life's work – the work of 140,000 researchers who never say never. As well as the millions of patients who fight side by side with researchers in the battle for life, against whatever odds they face together.
Now is the time to put the accelerator to the floor. The best is yet to come – like advancements in personalized medicine and immunotherapy – and it's coming faster than we can imagine.
Welcome to the future of medicine. Where disease is no match for tenacity. No match for ingenuity. Where together, we go boldly.
DO NOT GO GENTLE
Today's breakthroughs are becoming tomorrow's medicines.
 Watch the Video 



























































DO NOT GO GENTLE

















DO NOT GO GENTLE





 Share
 Tweet
 Link
 Email
 Print







This is the most exciting time in the history of medicine. Millions of people around the world are benefiting from breakthrough treatments that save, extend and improve life.
Research, technology and genomics are coming together to create a platform that allows researchers to decipher the cause of disease as never before. Each advance opens new doors, new cures, new treatments.
And yet, it’s not enough.
"Today's breakthroughs become tomorrow's medicines." Tweet
Cures don’t appear on a schedule. In search of the unknowable, in search of curing the incurable, there is no one map, no singular template, no predictable milestones.
Finding lifesaving medicines is a life’s work – the work of thousands of researchers who never say never. It's also the work of millions of patients who fight side by side with researchers in the battle for life, against whatever odds they face together.
Now is the time to put the accelerator to the floor. The best is yet to come – like groundbreaking advances in immunotherapy and personalized medicine – where the once impossible is now reality.
Welcome to the future of medicine. Where disease is no match for tenacity. No match for ingenuity. Where together, we go boldly.
Dylan Thomas penned "Do not go gentle into that good night" in 1947, but the sentiment is as timely today as it ever was. Millions of Americans are battling serious illnesses, but they’re not alone in the fight. They have the support of thousands of biopharmaceutical researchers whose lives are dedicated to helping patients go boldly into longer, healthier, and more productive lives.
 










      RELATED NEWS
    



THE POWER OF MEDICINES
Saving lives and creating hope for the future.
VIEW THE GRAPHIC



DRIVING PERSONALIZED MEDICINE FORWARD
The biopharmaceutical industry is leading the charge in finding new medicines for patients.
VIEW THE GALLERY



TRANSLATING SCIENCE INTO NEW MEDICINES
The commitment it takes for researchers and scientists to achieve breakthroughs in medicine.
WATCH THE VIDEO





















 Share
 Tweet
 Link
 Email
 Print








































GoBoldly - Latest stories from the American biopharmaceutical industry - Cells One

















      Skip to main content
    
















Explore the innovative research and technological breakthroughs of America's biopharmaceutical industry, and get to know the people behind the fight to prevent, treat, and cure disease.


















Our Fight


Our Mission


Our Companies













FOLLOW US






©2017 Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of America
950 F Street, NW Suite 300
Washington, DC 20004
202.835.3400 (P) | 202.835.3414 (F)
PhRMA.org Innovation.org
Privacy Policy Terms of Service


























AboutUS

Finding lifesaving medicines is a life's work – the work of 140,000 researchers who never say never. As well as the millions of patients who fight side by side with researchers in the battle for life, against whatever odds they face together.
Now is the time to put the accelerator to the floor. The best is yet to come – like advancements in personalized medicine and immunotherapy – and it's coming faster than we can imagine.
Welcome to the future of medicine. Where disease is no match for tenacity. No match for ingenuity. Where together, we go boldly.
DO NOT GO GENTLE
Today's breakthroughs are becoming tomorrow's medicines.
 Watch the Video 



























































A NEW WAY TO FIGHT CANCER 

















A NEW WAY TO FIGHT CANCER 





 Share
 Tweet
 Link
 Email
 Print







It used to be science fiction. Harnessing your body’s own immune system to fight cancer. But what was once the fruit of a wild imagination is today a reality.
Rather than killing cancer cells directly with traditional approaches like radiation or chemotherapy, immunotherapy harnesses the immune system’s power to eliminate the cancer or slow its growth and ability to spread. Research shows immunotherapy is improving outcomes and survival rates for some patients, including kidney and lung cancer. In fact, research from the American Association for Cancer Research shows that for advanced-melanoma patients, survival rates are improving thanks in part to these new treatment options.
"It used to be science fiction. Harnessing your body’s own immune system to fight cancer." Tweet
Biopharmaceutical researchers are urgently working to gain new insights into the complex interactions between patients’ immune systems and the cancer cells growing in their bodies with the goal of markedly improving outcomes in more tumor types.
With 836 medicines and vaccines in development for cancer, 80 percent of which have the potential to be first-in-class treatments, millions of Americans living with cancer have hope for a brighter future.
Welcome to the new era of medicine.
For all of us.
 










      RELATED NEWS
    



TRANSLATING SCIENCE INTO NEW MEDICINES
The commitment it takes for researchers and scientists to achieve breakthroughs in medicine.
WATCH THE VIDEO



DRIVING PERSONALIZED MEDICINE FORWARD
The biopharmaceutical industry is leading the charge in finding new medicines for patients.
VIEW THE GALLERY



THE POWER OF MEDICINES
Saving lives and creating hope for the future.
VIEW THE GRAPHIC





















 Share
 Tweet
 Link
 Email
 Print
















Food Allergy CODIT Oral Immunotherapy | Aimmune | Home     
  Welcome to Aimmune Therapeutics, formerly Allergen Research Corporation (ARC).We're pleased to announce our new name and launch our new website. Thank you for visiting! Visit Site  Friendshipsdon't have a listof ingredients.Aimmune is developing desensitization treatments to protect people with food allergies by potentially making accidental exposures less dangerous. Learn More  CODIT™ & Oral ImmunotherapyAimmune is developing treatments for food allergies using biologic product candidates and our characterized oral desensitization immunotherapy (CODIT™) approach. We built CODIT on a foundation of extensive independent scientific research on oral immunotherapy that shows that patients with food allergies may become desensitized by ingesting their allergens in gradually increasing amounts and then maintaining a steady daily dose thereafter. We aim to offer characterized biologic products to help protect people with food allergies against life-threatening reactions from accidental exposures. Learn More  AR101 for Peanut AllergyWe are conducting Phase 3 studies of our lead product candidate, AR101, for the treatment of peanut allergy, one of the most common food allergies, in peanut-allergic patients ages 4-55 years in the United States, Canada and Europe. We are also working to develop treatments for other common food allergies using characterized biologic product candidates and our CODIT™ approach. Learn MoreRecent NewsJuly 5, 2017Aimmune Therapeutics Enrolls First Patient in ARTEMIS (ARC010) European Phase 3 Clinical Trial of AR101 for the Treatment of Peanut AllergyJune 20, 2017Aimmune Therapeutics Presents European Phase 3 PALISADE Screening Data at 2017 European Academy of Allergy and Clinical Immunology (EAACI) CongressJune 15, 2017Aimmune Therapeutics to Present Data on Peanut Allergy in Europe at the European Academy of Allergy and Clinical Immunology (EAACI) Congress 2017 See More  












Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


